Utah statutes.
26-53-401.   School nurses evaluating student injuries.

(1)  A school nurse may assess a child who is suspected of sustaining a concussion or a traumatic head injury during school hours on school property regardless of whether the nurse has received specialized training in the evaluation and management of a concussion.

(2)  A school nurse who does not meet the requirements of Subsections 26-53-301(1)(b)(i) and (1)(b)(ii)(A), but who assesses a child who is suspected of sustaining a concussion or traumatic head injury under Subsection (1):

(a)  shall refer the child to a qualified health care provider who is trained in the evaluation and management of a concussion; and

(b)  may not provide a written statement permitting the child to resume participation in free play or physical education class under Subsection 26-53-301(1)(b)(ii).

(3)  A school nurse shall undergo training, described in Section 53A-6-112, in the evaluation and management of a concussion, as funding allows.



Enacted by Chapter 289, 2013 General Session

